District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.331

Pepco Cost-Sharing Fund for DC PLUG.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Pepco Cost-Sharing Fund for DC PLUG (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Director of the District Department of Transportation in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

The Fund shall consist of transfers from the Potomac Electric Power Company to facilitate cost-sharing for the District of Columbia Power Line Undergrounding (“DC PLUG”) initiative.

(c)

The Fund shall be used to pay for any purpose authorized by Chapter 13A of Title 34 [§ 34-1311.01 et seq.], for the DC PLUG initiative.

(d)

The money deposited into the Fund, and interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

History

Mar. 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-178, § 2, 62 DCR 864
October 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6142, 62 DCR 10905

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 21-36 also enacted this section.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) addition of h this section, see § 2 of the Pepco Cost-Sharing Fund for DC PLUG Establishment Temporary Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-178, March 7, 2015, 62 DCR 864).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) establishment of the Pepco Cost-Sharing Fund for DC PLUG, see § 2(a) of the Pepco Cost-Sharing Fund for DC PLUG Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-509, Dec. 8, 2014, 61 DCR 12719, 20 STAT 4431).
For temporary (90 days) establishment of the Pepco Cost-Sharing Fund For DC PLUG, see §  6142 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 21-36 repeated the enactment of this section by D.C. Law 20-178.